Massachusetts, session 194th, H3417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 
15TTTTT, the following section:— 
Section 15UUUUU. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the 
sixteenth day of June as Domestic Workers’ Rights Day, recommending its observance by the 
public to honor all domestic workers who work in private homes and in recognition of 
Massachusetts’ historic enactment of basic labor standards in the Domestic Workers’ Bill of 
Rights and recommending that said day be observed in an appropriate manner by the people.